Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-804
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act:

(1) Behavioral health disorder means mental illness or alcoholism,
drug abuse, or
other addictive disorder;

(2) Behavioral health region means a behavioral health region
established in section 71-807;

(3) Behavioral health services means services, including,
but not limited to, consumer-provided services, support services, inpatient
and outpatient services, and residential and nonresidential services, provided
for the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of behavioral health disorders
and the rehabilitation and recovery of persons with such disorders;

(4) Community-based behavioral health services or community-based
services means behavioral health services that are not provided at a regional
center;

(5) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(6) Director means the Director of Behavioral Health;

(7) Division means the Division of Behavioral Health of the
department;

(8) Medical assistance program means the program established
pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act;

(9) Public behavioral health system means the statewide array
of behavioral health services for children and adults provided by the public
sector or private sector and supported in whole or in part with funding received
and administered by the department, including behavioral health services provided
under the medical assistance program;

(10) Regional center means one of the state hospitals for
the mentally ill designated in section 83-305; and

(11) Regional center behavioral health services or regional
center services means behavioral health services provided at a regional center.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 74;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 454;

Laws 2013, LB6, § 13.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.